Hawaii statutes.
[§328E-2 Use prohibited.] No person
shall breathe, inhale or drink any compound, liquid or chemical containing
toluol, hexane, trichloroethylene, acetone, toluene, ethyl acetate, methyl
ethyl ketone, trichloroethane, isopropanol, methyl isobutyl ketone, methyl
cellosolve acetate, cyclohexanone, or any other substance for the purpose of
inducing a condition of intoxication, stupefaction, depression, giddiness,
paralysis or irrational behavior, or in any manner changing, distorting or
disturbing the auditory, visual or mental processes. For the purposes of this
chapter, any such condition so induced shall be deemed to be an intoxicated
condition. [L 1970, c 204, §2]

Cross References

Use of certain chemical substances as inhalants, see §330-8.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next